Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE A. TEXAS UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION ACT

CHAPTER 202. TEXAS EMPLOYMENT COMMISSION

SUBCHAPTER C. AGENCY ADMINISTRATOR AND PERSONNEL

Sec. 202.044. DIVISION OF EDUCATION. (a) The division of education is a division in the commission. The division shall assist the agency administrator and commission in administering their functions under Chapter 132, Education Code.

(b) The agency administrator shall assign sufficient staff to the division to enable it to perform its functions.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 40, eff. May 30, 1995.